Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-401
Clerk of Supreme Court; clerks of district and county courts; deputies.

The Clerk of the Supreme Court and of the several district and county courts in this state shall have power to appoint deputies. Each of such deputies shall be sworn to faithfully perform the duties of his or her office before entering upon such duties.

Laws 1879, § 43, p. 91;

Laws 1905, c. 58, § 1, p. 304;

Laws 1913, c. 173, § 1, p. 534;

R.S.1913, § 1194;

Laws 1917, c. 23, § 1, p. 88;

Laws 1919, c. 77, § 1, p. 198;

Laws 1921, c. 101, § 1, p. 370;

C.S.1922, § 1117;

C.S.1929, § 27-401;

R.S.1943, § 24-401;

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 13, p. 302;

Laws 2008, LB775, § 1.

Deputy district court clerk:

Mileage, see sections 23-1112 and 23-1112.01.

Salary, see section 23-1114.

Appointment of chief deputy was not made. McCollough v. County of Douglas, 150 Neb. 389, 34 N.W.2d 654 (1948).

Acts of deputy de facto are binding and can only be challenged by state. Haskell v. Dutton, 65 Neb. 274, 91 N.W. 395 (1902).

Clerk has authority to appoint assistants. State ex rel. Douglas County v. Frank, 61 Neb. 679, 85 N.W. 956 (1901); State ex rel. Douglas County v. Frank, 60 Neb. 327, 83 N.W. 74 (1900).